Maryland, session 2025, HB1277.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
5–1014.
(A) THE BEGINNING IN FISCAL YEAR 2027, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1277*

HOUSE BILL 1277
(1) ASSESS AND COLLECT AN 8% HOTEL RENTAL SURCHARGE ON
RENTAL UNITS ON THE PROPERTY OF THE SAVAGE RIVER LODGE; AND
(2) REMIT THE PROCEEDS FROM THE SURCHARGE TO THE
COMPTROLLER FOR DISTRIBUTION TO GARRETT COUNTY.
(B) (1) FROM THE PART OF THE SURCHARGE COLLECTED UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION THAT IS ATTRIBUTABLE TO A RATE OF 6%,
GARRETT COUNTY SHALL DESIGNATE A PORTION FOR THE PROMOTION OF THE
COUNTY.
(2) THE PART OF THE SURCHARGE COLLECTED UNDER SUBSECTION
(A) OF THIS SECTION THAT IS ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE RATE GREATER THAN 6%
SHALL BE DISTRIBUTED TO THE GENERAL FUND OF THE COUNTY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.